Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-9] Licensure by endorsement.
The director may issue a license by endorsement to an applicant who holds a
current and unencumbered license as a respiratory therapist in another state;
provided that the requirements for a license in that state are deemed by the
director to be equivalent to or higher than the current requirements for
licensure in this State. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next